Idaho, session 2025, H0290.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 39-1118, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-1118. IMMUNIZATION REQUIRED.
(1)(a) Within fourteen (14) days of a child's initial attendance at any
licensed daycare facility, the parent or guardian shall provide an im-
munization record to the operator of the daycare facility regarding the
child's immunity to certain childhood diseases. This record, signed by
a physician or his representative or another licensed health care pro-
fessional, shall verify that the child has received or is in the process
of receiving immunizations as specified by the board this section; or
can effectively demonstrate, through verification in a form approved by
the department, immunity gained through prior contraction of the dis-
ease. Documentation shall be retained by the licensed daycare facility
for each child as long as the child attends the daycare facility, plus
one (1) year after last attendance.
(b) Immunizations required and the manner and frequency of their ad-
ministration shall be as prescribed by the board and shall conform to
recognized standard medical practices in the state. The board shall
promulgate appropriate rules for the enforcement of the required immu-
nization program and specify reporting requirements of daycare facil-
ities, pursuant to the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.
The age appropriate immunizations required pursuant to this paragraph
shall conform to recognized standard medical practices in the state:
(i) Diphtheria, Tetanus and A-Cellular Pertussis (DTaP) vaccine;
(ii) Polio vaccine;
(iii) Measles, Mumps, and Rubella (MMR) vaccine;
(iv) Haemophilus Influenza Type B (HIB) vaccine;


(v) Hepatitis B vaccine;
(vi) Varicella vaccine;
(vii) Pneumococcal vaccine;
(viii) Rotavirus vaccine; and
(ix) Hepatitis A vaccine.
(2) Any minor child whose parent or guardian has submitted to officials
of a licensed daycare facility a certificate signed by a physician licensed
by the state board of medicine stating that the physical condition of the
child is such that all or any of the required immunizations would endanger
the life or health of the child shall be exempt from the provisions of this
section. Any minor child whose parent or guardian has submitted a signed
statement to officials of the daycare facility stating their objections on
religious or other grounds shall be exempt from the provisions of this sec-
tion.
(3) Licensed daycare facilities shall describe the exemptions provided
in subsection (2) of this section and shall provide a citation to this code
section in any communication to parents or guardians regarding immuniza-
tion.
(4) A child not meeting the conditions of this section shall be excluded
by the licensed daycare facility operator until the child is in compliance.
A child exempt from the provisions of this section pursuant to subsection (2)
of this section may be excluded by the department in the event of a disease
outbreak.
(5)(a) The department may randomly select and visit licensed daycare
facilities to evaluate compliance with this section. The department
shall inform licensed daycare facilities at least thirty (30) days in
advance of such visits.
(b) The department shall record violations in writing and provide a
copy to the licensed daycare operator. Licensed daycare operators
shall have thirty (30) days following an inspection to state that the
specified violations have been corrected. Failure to respond shall
result in notification to the licensed daycare operator's licensing
authority.
SECTION 2. That Section 39-4801, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-4801. IMMUNIZATION REQUIRED -- EXEMPTIONS. (1) Except as provided
in section 39-4802, Idaho Code subsections (5) and (6) of this section, any
child in Idaho of school age may attend preschool and kindergarten through
grade twelve (12) of any public, private, or parochial school operating in
this state if otherwise eligible, provided that, upon admission, the parent
or guardian shall provide an immunization record to the school authorities
regarding the child's immunity to certain childhood diseases. This record,
signed by a physician, the physician's representative, or another licensed
health care professional, shall verify that such child has received or is
in the process of receiving immunizations as specified by the state board of
health and welfare this section or can effectively demonstrate, through ver-
ification in a form approved by the department of health and welfare, immu-
nity gained through prior contraction of the disease.


(2) Immunizations required and the manner and frequency of their ad-
ministration shall be as prescribed by the state board of health and welfare
and shall conform to recognized standard medical practices in the state. The
state board of health and welfare, in cooperation with the state board of ed-
ucation and the Idaho school boards association, shall promulgate appropri-
ate rules for the enforcement of the required immunization program and spec-
ify reporting requirements of schools, pursuant to the provisions of chapter
52, title 67, Idaho Code. The manner and frequency of administration of age
appropriate immunizations pursuant to this subsection shall conform to rec-
ognized standard medical practices in the state:
(a) All children require the following:
(i) Diphtheria, Tetanus and A-Cellular Pertussis (DTaP) vaccine,
five (5) doses;
(ii) Hepatitis A vaccine, two (2) doses;
(iii) Hepatitis B vaccine, three (3) doses;
(iv) Measles, Mumps, and Rubella (MMR) vaccine, two (2) doses;
(v) Polio vaccine, four (4) doses; and
(vi) Varicella vaccine, two (2) doses.
(b) In addition to the criteria listed in paragraph (a) of this subsec-
tion, the following must be met for admission into the seventh grade:
(i) Diphtheria, Tetanus and A-Cellular Pertussis (DTaP) Booster,
one (1) dose; and
(ii) Meningococcal vaccine, one (1) dose.
(c) In addition to the criteria listed in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this
subsection, prior to admission into the twelfth grade, students who
received their first dose of meningococcal vaccine before sixteen (16)
years of age must have two (2) doses of meningococcal vaccine, and stu-
dents who received their first dose of meningococcal vaccine at sixteen
(16) years age of older, or those who have never received a dose, must
have one (1) dose of meningococcal vaccine.
(3) A student not meeting the conditions of this section shall be ex-
cluded by school authorities, and such students may not attend any Idaho pub-
lic, private, or parochial school until the student is in compliance. A stu-
dent exempted under subsections (5) or (6) of this section may be excluded by
the department in the event of a disease outbreak.
(4) School authorities shall submit a report of the school's immuniza-
tion status by grade to the department on or before November 1 each year, in-
cluding the following information:
(a) Inclusive dates or reporting period;
(b) Name and address of school, school district, and county;
(c) Grade being reported and total number of students enrolled in the
grade;
(d) Name and title of the person completing the report form;
(e) Number of students who meet all of the immunizations criteria;
(f) Number of students who do not meet the specified number of immuniza-
tions listed by specific immunization type;
(g) Number of students who do not meet the immunization criteria but are
in the process of receiving the immunizations; and
(h) Number of students who claimed exemption to the immunizations.


(5) Any minor child whose parent or guardian has submitted to school of-
ficials a certificate signed by a physician licensed by the state board of
medicine stating that the physical condition of the child is such that all or
any of the immunizations would endanger the life or health of the child shall
be exempt from the provisions of this chapter.
(6) Any minor child whose parent or guardian has submitted a signed
statement to school officials stating their objections on religious or other
grounds shall be exempt from the provisions of this chapter.
(7) School officials shall describe the exemptions provided in this
section and provide a citation to this section in any communication to par-
ents and guardians regarding immunization.
(8) Any student of majority age who submits a signed statement to school
officials stating the student's objections on religious or other grounds
shall be exempt from any or all immunization criteria at every public, pri-
vate, or parochial school in this state, including postsecondary, trade,
college, university, or any other institute of primary, secondary, or higher
learning.
SECTION 3. That Section 39-4802, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 4. That Section 39-4803, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-4803. IMMUNIZATION REGISTRY. (1) The department of health and wel-
fare shall provide for the establishment of a voluntary registry of the immu-
nization status of Idaho children against childhood diseases. The registry
shall be maintained and its data disclosed as set out herein to further the
following purposes:
(a) To make immunizations readily available to every Idaho citizen that
desires to have their child immunized;
(b) To increase the voluntary immunization rate in Idaho to the maximum
extent possible without mandating such immunizations;
(c) To recognize and respect the rights of parents and guardians to make
health care decisions for their children; and
(d) To provide for timely reminders to parents of children in the reg-
istry.
(2) The name of a child and information relating to the immunization
status of that child shall be collected and included in the registry unless
a parent, guardian or other person legally responsible for the care of the
child chooses not to have the child included in the registry upon a specified
written statement. Such statement may not be part of a general authorization
or release. The registry shall contain the following information for each
child:
(a) The child's name, address and birth date;
(b) The name and address of each parent of the child;
(c) The month, day, year and type of each immunization that has been ad-
ministered to the child;
(d) The name, address and phone number of each provider that has admin-
istered an immunization to the child;


(e) If requested by a parent or guardian, any statement made pursuant to
subsection (4) of this section; and
(f) Other information as authorized or requested by a parent or
guardian.
(3) The department of health and welfare shall only disclose informa-
tion relating to an individual child in the registry to the following upon a
specific request:
(a) Employees of the health district in which the child resides or seeks
medical services;
(b) Health records staff of the school or school district in which the
child is enrolled;
(c) The operator of a licensed daycare facility in which the child is
enrolled;
(d) Persons who are legally responsible for the long-term care of the
child, including operators of licensed ICF/ID's and residential or as-
sisted living facilities, adoptive and foster parents and a guardian
appointed pursuant to chapter 5, title 15, Idaho Code;
(e) Any health care provider rendering treatment to the child, and the
provider's agents;
(f) Any person possessing a lawful release, properly executed by the
child's parent or guardian;
(g) A parent of the child;
(h) Any hospital where the child is receiving care; or
(i) The Idaho health data exchange.
(4) A parent or guardian of the child shall have free and open access to
all information in the registry that relates to their child or themselves.
Upon the written request of a parent or guardian, the department of health
and welfare shall:
(a) Cause all information relating to the child to be removed from the
registry;
(b) Include in the registry the statement of a physician or parent pur-
suant to section 39-4802(2) 39-4801(5) or 39-1118(2), Idaho Code.
(5) All information contained in the registry or disclosed from it is
confidential and may not be sold and may only be disclosed as specifically
authorized in this section. A person or entity to whom information is dis-
closed from the registry may not thereafter disclose it to others except in
accordance with state and federal laws applicable to the use of protected
health information. Any person who discloses or authorizes disclosure of
any information contained in the registry, except as authorized in this sec-
tion, is guilty of a misdemeanor and is liable for civil damages in the amount
of one hundred dollars ($100) for each violation.
SECTION 5. That Section 39-4804, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-4804. NOTIFICATION TO PARENT OR GUARDIAN. (1) Before an immuniza-
tion is administered to any child in this state, the parent or guardian of the
child shall be notified that:
(a) Immunizations are not mandatory and may be refused on religious or
other grounds;
(b) Participation in the immunization registry is voluntary;


(c) The parent or guardian is entitled to an accurate explanation of the
complications known to follow such immunization.
(2) At the time information is initially collected regarding any child
for entry into the registry created pursuant to this chapter, the parent or
guardian shall be notified that:
(a) They have the right under Idaho law to submit a statement pursuant
to the provisions of sections 39-1118 and 39-4802 39-4801(5) or (6),
Idaho Code, which exempts them from any requirement to have information
regarding the child entered into the registry;
(b) At any time they have the right to remove any information from the
registry regarding the child; and
(c) Immunizations are not mandatory and may be refused on religious or
other grounds.
(3) The decision of a parent or guardian to:
(a) Submit a statement pursuant to the provisions of either section
39-1118(2) or 39-4802(2) 39-4801(5) or (6), Idaho Code;
(b) Remove any information regarding the child from the registry pur-
suant to the provisions of section 39-4803(4), Idaho Code; or
(c) Refuse the immunization on religious or other grounds;
shall not be used in any manner against the interests of the parent or
guardian in any administrative, civil or criminal action.
SECTION 6. That Section 39-4805, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 7. The rules contained in IDAPA 16.02.11, Idaho Department of
Health and Welfare, relating to Immunization Requirements for Licensed Day-
care Facility Attendees, shall be null, void, and of no force and effect on
and after July 1, 2025.
SECTION 8. The rules contained in IDAPA 16.02.15, Idaho Department of
Health and Welfare, relating to Immunization Requirements for Idaho School
Children, shall be null, void, and of no force and effect on and after July 1,
2025.
SECTION 9. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.